Utah statutes.
17B-1-404.   Petition requirements.
(1)  Each petition under Subsection 17B-1-403(1)(a) shall:
(a)  indicate the typed or printed name and current residence address of each
person signing the petition;
(b)  separately group signatures by county and municipality, so that all
signatures of the owners of real property located within or of registered
voters residing within each county whose unincorporated area includes and each
municipality whose boundaries include part of the area proposed for annexation
are grouped separately;
(c)  if it is a petition under Subsection 17B-1-403(1)(a)(i) or (ii)(A),
indicate the address of the property as to which the owner is signing the
petition;
(d)  designate up to three signers of the petition as sponsors, one of whom
shall be designated the contact sponsor, with the mailing address and
telephone number of each;
(e)  be filed with the board of trustees of the proposed annexing local
district; and
(f)  for a petition under Subsection 17B-1-403(1)(a)(i), state the proposed
method of supplying water to the area proposed to be annexed.
(2)  By submitting a written withdrawal or reinstatement with the board of
trustees of the proposed annexing local district, a signer of a petition may
withdraw, or once withdrawn, reinstate the signer's signature at any time:
(a)  before the public hearing under Section 17B-1-409 is held; or
(b)  if a hearing is not held because of Subsection 17B-1-413(1) or because no
hearing is requested under Subsection 17B-1-413(2)(a)(ii)(B), until 20 days
after the local district provides notice under Subsection 17B-1-413(2)(a)(i).
